Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 2

Old Age Assistance

71-2-201. Short title.

This part may be cited as the “Old-Age Assistance Law.”

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 20; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.17 (Williams, § 4765.34); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-201, 14-2-101.

71-2-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Assistance” means either money payments made to or in behalf of aged persons in need, or medical care and treatment, nursing home care, drugs including hospitalization, and outpatient care or any other type of remedial care recognized under state law in behalf of aged persons in need, or any of these, but does not include subdivisions (1)(A)-(1)(D) unless the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.), is amended to include one (1) or more of the following:

Any such payments to or care in behalf of any individual who is an inmate of a public institution, except as a patient in a medical institution, or any individual who is a patient in an institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases;

Any such payments to any individual who has been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or psychosis and is a patient in a medical institution as a result of tuberculosis or psychosis;

Any such care in behalf of any individual, who is a patient in a medical institution as a result of a diagnosis that such individual has tuberculosis or psychosis, with respect to any period after the individual has been a patient in such an institution as a result of such diagnosis, for forty-two (42) days; or

Is not an inmate of any private institution except such private institution as has been approved by the department at the time of receiving assistance;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Recipient” means a person who was receiving old age assistance benefits during the month of December 1973, and is now qualified under the provisions of Public Law 93-66 to continue to receive a state money payment as a supplement to the federally-provided supplemental security income benefits; and

“Regional director” means the director of a region under chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 1; 1939, ch. 134, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.18 (Williams, § 4765.17); Acts 1957, ch. 117, § 1; 1965, ch. 14, § 1; 1973, ch. 337, § 2; 1974, ch. 628, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-202, 14-2-102.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions for supplemental security income benefits, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.

Public Law 93-66 referred to in this section may be found in 26 U.S.C. §§ 1402, 3121-3125, 6413, 6654 and in 42 U.S.C. §§ 402-415, 430, 1320, 1382, 1383, 1396A and 1396B and notes.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 5.19.

71-2-203. Eligibility for assistance.

Assistance shall be granted under this part to any person who:

Is sixty-five (65) years of age or older;

Is living within this state voluntarily and not for a temporary purpose, that is, with no intention of presently removing from the state; provided, that temporary absence from the state, with subsequent returns to the state or intent to return when the purposes of the absence have been accomplished, shall not, for the purpose of this part, interrupt continuity of residence;

Has not sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health; and whose spouse is not able to meet such person's needs as determined by the department's standards; and

Within five (5) years immediately preceding application or during receipt of assistance, has not, in order to evade any provision of this part, made an assignment or transfer of property, the proceeds from which at the fair market value, irrespective of the actual consideration received, would under the state standards of need still be available to meet the needs of the individual. Any transfer of property to a husband, wife, son, daughter, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, nephew or niece, within the period above mentioned, shall be prima facie evidence that the transfer was made with the intent to evade this part; or

Was receiving old age assistance benefits during the month of December 1973, and is now qualified under Public Law 93-66 to continue to receive a state money payment as a supplement to the federally-provided supplemental security income benefits.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 2; 1949, ch. 85, § 1; 1949, ch. 135, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.19 (Williams, § 4765.18); Acts 1951, ch. 104, § 1; 1951, ch. 223, § 1; 1955, ch. 24, § 1; 1955, ch. 169, § 1; 1957, ch. 81, § 1; 1957, ch. 116, § 1; 1965, ch. 14, § 2; 1967, ch. 64, §§ 1, 2; 1970, ch. 369, § 1; 1974, ch. 628, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-203, 14-2-103.

Compiler's Notes. Public Law 93-66 referred to in this section may be found in 26 U.S.C. §§ 1402, 3121-3125, 6413, 6654 and in 42 U.S.C. §§ 402-415, 430, 1320, 1382, 1383, 1396A and 1396B and notes.

Provisions for supplemental security income benefits, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq.

71-2-204. Determination of amount of assistance.

The amount of assistance that any person shall receive in the form of supplementary money payments shall be determined by an application of § 212(a) of Public Law 93-66 and rules and regulations made by the department establishing standards of need and allowable resources to the recipient's present personal and economic circumstances.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 3; 1945, ch. 187, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.20 (Williams, § 4765.19); Acts 1953, ch. 8, § 1; modified; 1957, ch. 22, § 3; 1957, ch. 117, § 2; 1961, ch. 24, § 1; 1965, ch. 14, § 3; 1967, ch. 64, § 3; 1973, ch. 303, § 12; 1974, ch. 628, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-204, 14-2-104.

Compiler's Notes. Section 212(a) of Public Law 93-66, referred to in this section may be found in the notes following 42 U.S.C. § 1382.

71-2-205. Duties of department.

The department shall:

Supervise the administration of assistance to the needy aged under this part by the regional directors;

Make such rules and regulations and take such action as may be necessary or desirable for carrying out this part. All rules and regulations made by the department shall be binding on the counties and shall be complied with by the respective regional directors;

Establish standards for personnel employed by the department in the administration of this part and make necessary rules and regulations to maintain such standards;

Prepare and supply to the regional directors such forms as it may deem necessary and advisable;

Cooperate with the commissioner of social security, or any federal officer or agency made successor to the commissioner of social security, in any reasonable manner as may be necessary to qualify for federal aid for assistance to the needy aged and in conformity with this part, including the making of such reports in such forms and containing such information as the commissioner of social security may from time to time require, and comply with such provisions as such commissioner may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports; and

Publish an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.21 (Williams, § 4765.20); modified; Acts 1973, ch. 303, § 13; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-206, 14-2-105.

71-2-206. Duty of regional directors.

The regional directors shall administer this part in the counties of their regions, subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the department, and shall report to the department at such time and in such manner as it may direct.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.22 (Williams, § 4765.21); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-207, 14-2-106.

71-2-207. Appeal to department.

If any award of assistance is modified or cancelled under any provision of this part, the recipient may appeal to the department in the manner and form prescribed by it. The department shall, upon receipt of such an appeal, give the recipient reasonable notice and opportunity for a hearing.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 9; 1945, ch. 187, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.26 (Williams, § 4765.25); Acts 1973, ch. 303, § 15; 1974, ch. 628, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-212, 14-2-107.

71-2-208. Finality of departmental decision.

All decisions of the department shall be final and shall be binding upon the county involved and shall be complied with by the regional director or a designated agent.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 9; 1945, ch. 187, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.26 (Williams, § 4765.25); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-214, 14-2-108.

71-2-209. Periodical reinvestigation of grants.

All assistance grants in the form of money payments made under this part shall be reconsidered by the regional director or a designated agent as frequently as may be required by the rules of the department. After such further investigation as the regional director or a designated agent may deem necessary or the department may require, the amount of assistance may be changed or assistance may be entirely withdrawn if the recipient's circumstances have altered to warrant such action.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 10; 1945, ch. 187, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.27 (Williams, § 4765.26); Acts 1957, ch. 117, § 5; 1973, ch. 303, § 17; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-215, 14-2-109.

71-2-210. Change in circumstances of recipient.

If at any time during the continuance of assistance the recipient becomes possessed of any property or income in excess of the amount stated in the application, it shall be the duty of the recipient immediately to notify the regional director or a designated agent of the receipt or possession of such property or income. The regional director or a designated agent may, after investigation, either cancel the assistance or alter the amount of the money payment in accordance with the circumstances. Any assistance paid after the recipient has come into possession of such property or income and in excess of the recipient's need as determined by the department's standards shall be recoverable in a suit by the state as a debt due to the state.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 11; 1945, ch. 187, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.28 (Williams, § 4765.27); Acts 1957, ch. 117, § 6; 1961, ch. 13, § 1; 1974, ch. 628, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-216, 14-2-110.

71-2-211. Removal of recipient from county.

Any recipient who moves to another county in this state shall be entitled, with the approval of the department, to receive assistance in the county to which the recipient has moved, and the regional director or a designated agent of the county from which the recipient has moved shall transfer all necessary records relating to the recipient to the regional director or a designated agent of the county to which the recipient has moved.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 13; 1945, ch. 187, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.30 (Williams, § 4765.29); Acts 1951, ch. 161, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-217, 14-2-111.

71-2-212. Amendment of part.

All assistance granted under this part shall be deemed to be granted and to be held subject to any amending or repealing statute that may hereafter be passed, and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of such recipient's assistance being affected in any way by any amendment or repealing statute.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.36 (Williams, § 4765.33); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-218, 14-2-112.

71-2-213. Charging for assistance to applicants unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to directly or indirectly either charge or receive anything of value for assisting any person in making application to the proper authorities of this state, or any of them, for relief or assistance under any statutes of this state providing for financial assistance to persons over sixty-five (65) years of age.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1937, ch. 118, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.37; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-219, 14-2-113; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-2-214. Unlawful use of lists of recipients.

Except as permitted by §§ 71-1-117 and 71-1-118, it is unlawful for any person, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of this part, to solicit, disclose, receive, make use of, authorize or knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce in the use of, any list or names of, or any information concerning, persons applying for or receiving old-age assistance, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files, or communications of the department or divisions of the department, or acquired in the course of the performance of official duties.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1941, ch. 148, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.37 (Williams, § 11412.7); impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1 (a, b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-220, 14-2-114; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-2-215. Penalty for fraudulent acts.

Whoever:

Knowingly obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids, or abets any persons to obtain by means of a willfully false statement or representation or by impersonation, or other fraudulent device, assistance to which such person is not entitled or assistance greater than that to which such person is justly entitled; or

With intent to defraud, aids or abets in buying or in any way disposing of the property, either personal or real, of a recipient of assistance, without the consent of the department;

commits a Class E felony.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 18; 1943, ch. 42, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.35 (Williams, § 4765.32); Acts 1955, ch. 26, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-221, 14-2-115; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 102.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

71-2-216. Assistance not assignable — Exemption from execution.

Assistance granted under this part is not transferable or assignable, at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable under this part shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

Acts 1937, ch. 49, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 4765.25 (Williams, § 4765.24); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-222, 14-2-116.